Louisiana, session 2026, HB1237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:157(C)(1), 2225.4(B), (C)(2), and (D), 2227(D)(2), and
2262.1(A), (B), and (D)(introductory paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:2262.1(D)(3) and (4) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§157. Firefighters' Retirement System; Municipal Police Employees' Retirement
System; optional membership; refund of employee contributions; irrevocable
election; reenrollment; membership verification information
* * *
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
C.(1) Any employee who elects not to become a member of the applicable
retirement system set forth in Subsection A of this Section shall, before such election
can become valid, execute and file with the retirement system an affidavit stating
that his election not to be a member is of his own free will and is his own voluntary
act and deed. For an employee as defined in R.S. 11:2213, the affidavit shall be
signed and notarized by the chief of police or mayor of the employing municipality.
* * *
§2225.4. Unfunded accrued liability; payment by employer
* * *
B.(1) Any amount due pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be
determined by the actuary employed by the system and shall be amortized over
fifteen years in equal monthly payments with interest at the system's valuation
interest rate. Such payments shall be payable to the system electronically beginning
July first of the second fiscal year following the determination by the actuary and in
the same manner as regular payroll payments to the system. Beginning July first of
the fiscal year following the withdrawal dissolution, interest shall accrue at the
system's actuarial valuation rate, compounded annually.
(2) If the number of participating employees of an employer subject to
Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section returns to at least the number of participating
employees as of the June thirtieth immediately preceding the withdrawal, the
payments required by this Section shall cease on the July first following the
determination by the actuary that a sufficient increase in participating employees has
occurred, and no further payments shall be due with respect to the withdrawal. Any
payments made pursuant to this Section shall be credited as an offset of any amounts
due by the employer attributable to any subsequent withdrawal that occurs within
fifteen years of the payments.
C.
* * *
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board of
trustees shall not collect any payments due from an employer for any partial
dissolution that occurred prior to July 1, 2018. July 1, 2025.
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Participating employee" shall mean an active member or participant in
the Deferred Retirement Option Plan.
(2) "Withdrawal" shall mean the dissolution or partial dissolution of a police
department as described in Subsection A of this Section. For the purposes of this
Section, the unfunded accrued liability shall be determined using the level percentage
of payroll entry age normal actuarial accrued liability.
* * *
§2227. Method of financing
* * *
D. Pension accumulation fund:
The pension accumulation fund shall be the fund in which shall be
accumulated all reserves for the payment of all pension and benefits payable from
contributions made by employers. Contributions to and payments from the pension
accumulation fund shall be made as follows:
* * *
(2) Delinquent payments due under R.S. 11:2227(B)(1) and 2227(D)(1) may
be recovered through either of the following actions:
(a) Upon certification to the state treasurer and written notice to the
municipality by the director that a municipality's monthly report and payment of
contributions is delinquent, the state treasurer shall deduct the amount of the
delinquent contributions from any monies then available for distribution to or for the
benefit of that municipality and shall transmit said amount directly to the board of
trustees of the retirement system. Upon making such a deduction, the state treasurer
shall immediately notify the municipality that the deduction has been made and that
the funds available for distribution to it are reduced accordingly. In like manner, the
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
director of the system, upon receipt of said funds, shall credit such funds to the
proper account affected thereby and shall notify the municipality thereof; or
(b) Through an action initiated in a court of competent jurisdiction against
the political subdivision or instrumentality liable therefor together with interest
charged at the legal rate computed from the date the payment became delinquent.
* * *
§2262.1. Dissolution of fire department; unfunded accrued liability; payment by
employer
A.(1)(a) If an employer fully dissolves its fire department, the employer shall
remit to the system, beginning the first July immediately following the date of
dissolution, that portion of the unfunded accrued liability existing on the thirtieth of
June immediately prior to the date of dissolution of the fire department that is
attributable to such employer and calculated using the allocation percentage included
in the prior fiscal year's employer pension report produced according to requirements
established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board. The amount due
pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph shall include interest at the system's
valuation interest rate.
(b) For the purposes of this Section, the actuary employed by the system may
make adjustments to the allocation percentages included in the employer pension
report for the prior fiscal year based on additional information.
(2)(a) If an employer partially dissolves its fire department during a fiscal
year, the employer shall be liable for a pro rata portion of the system's unfunded
accrued liability. The portion shall be calculated by applying the percentage
decrease in the salaries paid to participating employees by the employer on the
thirtieth of June and salaries paid to participating employees by the employer as of
the thirtieth of June of the prior year to multiplying the total payment that would
have been required pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection if
the employer had fully dissolved its fire department. Payments required pursuant to
the provisions of this Paragraph shall include interest at the system's valuation
interest rate. by the ratio of the difference between the fiscal year's base employee
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
count and the fiscal year's participating employee count to the prior fiscal year's
participating employee count. Payments required pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph shall include interest at the system's valuation interest rate.
(b) An employer shall be deemed to have partially dissolved its fire
department if either of the following occurs:
(i) The number of participating employees of the employer participating
employer count as of the thirtieth of June is less than seventy percent of the base
employee count rounded down to the nearest whole number, and the difference
between the base employee count and the participating employee count is at least
three number of participating employees of the employer on the thirtieth of June of
the prior year and either the number of participating employees decreases by at least
three or the number of participating employees is zero.
(ii) The number of participating employees of the employer as of the thirtieth
of June employee count is at least fifty fewer than the number of participating
employees of the employer as of the thirtieth of June of the prior year. base employee
count.
B.(1) Any amount due pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be
determined by the actuary employed by the system and shall be amortized over
fifteen years in equal payments with interest at the system's valuation rate. Payments
Any payments for withdrawals that occur on or after July 1, 2021, shall be payable
beginning the first of July of the second fiscal year following the determination by
the actuary and if such determination occurs prior to June 30, 2024, or beginning
July first of the third fiscal year following the determination by the actuary if such
determination occurs on or after June 30, 2024. Such payments shall be payable in
the same manner as regular payroll payments to the system. Beginning on the first
of July of the fiscal year following withdrawal, interest shall accrue at the system's
actuarial valuation rate, compounded annually.
(2)(a) If the number of participating employees participating employee count
of an employer subject to Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section returns to at least the
number of participating employees as of the thirtieth of June immediately preceding
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
the withdrawal, base employee count for the fiscal year of partial dissolution, the
payments required by this Section shall cease on the first of July following the
determination by the actuary that a sufficient increase in participating employees has
occurred, and no further payments shall be due with respect to the withdrawal. partial
dissolution. Any payments made pursuant to this Section that partial dissolution
shall be credited as an offset of any amounts due by the employer attributable to any
subsequent withdrawal that occurs partial dissolution occurring after the fiscal year
of the sufficient increase in participating employees but within fifteen years of the
payments.
(b) Each fiscal year, for each employer subject to Paragraph (A)(2) of this
Section for which a payment remains due in the following fiscal year, the system's
actuary shall review the participating employee count for the employer for the prior
fiscal year. Beginning July first for the fiscal year following the actuary's review,
the payments determined according to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall be
proportionately adjusted based on the participating employee count for the employer
for the prior fiscal year. Such adjustments shall not cause the proportional payment
to exceed the payment initially determined for the partial dissolution.
* * *
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall mean have the
following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Participating employee count" for an employer for a fiscal year shall
mean the number of participating employees as of June thirtieth of that fiscal year.
(4) "Base employee count" for an employer for a fiscal year shall mean the
number of participating employees as of June thirtieth of the prior fiscal year unless
the employer has partially dissolved in one or more of the prior fifteen fiscal years
and payments remain due for at least one such partial dissolution. In that case, the
base employee count for an employer for a fiscal year shall be the lesser of the
smallest participating employee count from such prior partial dissolution or the
number of the participating employees as of the June thirtieth of the prior fiscal year.
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1237 ENROLLED
E. For the purposes of this Section, the unfunded accrued liability shall be
determined using the level percentage of payroll entry age normal actuarial accrued
liability.
Section 2. R.S. 11:2225.4(A)(2) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.